Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 5. Reserve Requirements

§§ 13-2-501 through 13-2-503.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 29, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 157, §§ 30, 39 and 40, related to cash reserve requirements for banks not members of the federal reserve system or which solicit or receive savings deposits.